Missouri, session 2026, SB1614.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 143.121, RSMo, is repealed and ten new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
143.121, 285.400, 285.405, 285.410, 285.415, 285.420, 285.425,
285.430, 285.435, and 285.440, to read as follows:
143.121. 1. The Missouri adjusted gross income of a
resident individual shall be the taxpayer's federal adjusted
gross income subject to the modifications in this section.
2. There shall be added to the taxpayer's federal
adjusted gross income:
(1) The amount of any federal income tax refund
received for a prior year which resulted in a Missouri
income tax benefit. The amount added pursuant to this
subdivision shall not include any amount of a federal income
tax refund attributable to a tax credit reducing a
taxpayer's federal tax liability pursuant to Public Law 116-
136 or 116-260, enacted by the 116th United States Congress,
for the tax year beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and
ending on or before December 31, 2020, and deducted from
Missouri adjusted gross income pursuant to section 143.171.
The amount added under this subdivision shall also not
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1614 2
include any amount of a federal income tax refund
attributable to a tax credit reducing a taxpayer's federal
tax liability under any other federal law that provides
direct economic impact payments to taxpayers to mitigate
financial challenges related to the COVID-19 pandemic, and
deducted from Missouri adjusted gross income under section
143.171;
(2) Interest on certain governmental obligations
excluded from federal gross income by 26 U.S.C. Section 103
of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended. The previous
sentence shall not apply to interest on obligations of the
state of Missouri or any of its political subdivisions or
authorities and shall not apply to the interest described in
subdivision (1) of subsection 3 of this section. The amount
added pursuant to this subdivision shall be reduced by the
amounts applicable to such interest that would have been
deductible in computing the taxable income of the taxpayer
except only for the application of 26 U.S.C. Section 265 of
the Internal Revenue Code, as amended. The reduction shall
only be made if it is at least five hundred dollars;
(3) The amount of any deduction that is included in
the computation of federal taxable income pursuant to 26
U.S.C. Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code as amended
by the Job Creation and Worker Assistance Act of 2002 to the
extent the amount deducted relates to property purchased on
or after July 1, 2002, but before July 1, 2003, and to the
extent the amount deducted exceeds the amount that would
have been deductible pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Section 168 of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 as in effect on January 1,
2002;
(4) The amount of any deduction that is included in
the computation of federal taxable income for net operating

SB 1614 3
loss allowed by 26 U.S.C. Section 172 of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, other than the deduction
allowed by 26 U.S.C. Section [172(b)(1)(G)] 172(b)(1)(F) and
26 U.S.C. Section [172(i)] 172(h) of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, for a net operating loss the
taxpayer claims in the tax year in which the net operating
loss occurred or carries forward for a period of more than
twenty years and carries backward for more than two years.
Any amount of net operating loss taken against federal
taxable income but disallowed for Missouri income tax
purposes pursuant to this subdivision after June 18, 2002,
may be carried forward and taken against any income on the
Missouri income tax return for a period of not more than
twenty years from the year of the initial loss; and
(5) For nonresident individuals in all taxable years
ending on or after December 31, 2006, the amount of any
property taxes paid to another state or a political
subdivision of another state for which a deduction was
allowed on such nonresident's federal return in the taxable
year unless such state, political subdivision of a state, or
the District of Columbia allows a subtraction from income
for property taxes paid to this state for purposes of
calculating income for the income tax for such state,
political subdivision of a state, or the District of
Columbia;
(6) For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2018, any interest expense paid or accrued in a previous
taxable year, but allowed as a deduction under 26 U.S.C.
Section 163, as amended, in the current taxable year by
reason of the carryforward of disallowed business interest
provisions of 26 U.S.C. Section 163(j), as amended. For the
purposes of this subdivision, an interest expense is

SB 1614 4
considered paid or accrued only in the first taxable year
the deduction would have been allowable under 26 U.S.C.
Section 163, as amended, if the limitation under 26 U.S.C.
Section 163(j), as amended, did not exist.
3. There shall be subtracted from the taxpayer's
federal adjusted gross income the following amounts to the
extent included in federal adjusted gross income:
(1) Interest received on deposits held at a federal
reserve bank or interest or dividends on obligations of the
United States and its territories and possessions or of any
authority, commission or instrumentality of the United
States to the extent exempt from Missouri income taxes
pursuant to the laws of the United States. The amount
subtracted pursuant to this subdivision shall be reduced by
any interest on indebtedness incurred to carry the described
obligations or securities and by any expenses incurred in
the production of interest or dividend income described in
this subdivision. The reduction in the previous sentence
shall only apply to the extent that such expenses including
100 amortizable bond premiums are deducted in determining the
101 taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income or included in the
102 taxpayer's Missouri itemized deduction. The reduction shall
103 only be made if the expenses total at least five hundred
104 dollars;
105 (2) The portion of any gain, from the sale or other
106 disposition of property having a higher adjusted basis to
107 the taxpayer for Missouri income tax purposes than for
108 federal income tax purposes on December 31, 1972, that does
109 not exceed such difference in basis. If a gain is
110 considered a long-term capital gain for federal income tax
111 purposes, the modification shall be limited to one-half of
112 such portion of the gain;

SB 1614 5
113 (3) The amount necessary to prevent the taxation
114 pursuant to this chapter of any annuity or other amount of
115 income or gain which was properly included in income or gain
116 and was taxed pursuant to the laws of Missouri for a taxable
117 year prior to January 1, 1973, to the taxpayer, or to a
118 decedent by reason of whose death the taxpayer acquired the
119 right to receive the income or gain, or to a trust or estate
120 from which the taxpayer received the income or gain;
121 (4) Accumulation distributions received by a taxpayer
122 as a beneficiary of a trust to the extent that the same are
123 included in federal adjusted gross income;
124 (5) The amount of any state income tax refund for a
125 prior year which was included in the federal adjusted gross
126 income;
127 (6) The portion of capital gain specified in section
128 135.357 that would otherwise be included in federal adjusted
129 gross income;
130 (7) The amount that would have been deducted in the
131 computation of federal taxable income pursuant to 26 U.S.C.
132 Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code as in effect on
133 January 1, 2002, to the extent that amount relates to
134 property purchased on or after July 1, 2002, but before July
135 1, 2003, and to the extent that amount exceeds the amount
136 actually deducted pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Section 168 of the
137 Internal Revenue Code as amended by the Job Creation and
138 Worker Assistance Act of 2002;
139 (8) For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
140 2005, the amount of any income received for military service
141 while the taxpayer serves in a combat zone which is included
142 in federal adjusted gross income and not otherwise excluded
143 therefrom. As used in this section, "combat zone" means any
144 area which the President of the United States by Executive

SB 1614 6
145 Order designates as an area in which Armed Forces of the
146 United States are or have engaged in combat. Service is
147 performed in a combat zone only if performed on or after the
148 date designated by the President by Executive Order as the
149 date of the commencing of combat activities in such zone,
150 and on or before the date designated by the President by
151 Executive Order as the date of the termination of combatant
152 activities in such zone;
153 (9) For all tax years ending on or after July 1, 2002,
154 with respect to qualified property that is sold or otherwise
155 disposed of during a taxable year by a taxpayer and for
156 which an additional modification was made under subdivision
157 (3) of subsection 2 of this section, the amount by which
158 additional modification made under subdivision (3) of
159 subsection 2 of this section on qualified property has not
160 been recovered through the additional subtractions provided
161 in subdivision (7) of this subsection;
162 (10) The amount contributed to the Missouri earned
163 family and medical leave fund established under section
164 285.435;
165 (11) For all tax years beginning on or after January
166 1, 2014, the amount of any income received as payment from
167 any program which provides compensation to agricultural
168 producers who have suffered a loss as the result of a
169 disaster or emergency, including the:
170 (a) Livestock Forage Disaster Program;
171 (b) Livestock Indemnity Program;
172 (c) Emergency Assistance for Livestock, Honeybees, and
173 Farm-Raised Fish;
174 (d) Emergency Conservation Program;
175 (e) Noninsured Crop Disaster Assistance Program;
176 (f) Pasture, Rangeland, Forage Pilot Insurance Program;

SB 1614 7
177 (g) Annual Forage Pilot Program;
178 (h) Livestock Risk Protection Insurance Plan;
179 (i) Livestock Gross Margin Insurance Plan;
180 [(11)] (12) For all tax years beginning on or after
181 January 1, 2018, any interest expense paid or accrued in the
182 current taxable year, but not deducted as a result of the
183 limitation imposed under 26 U.S.C. Section 163(j), as
184 amended. For the purposes of this subdivision, an interest
185 expense is considered paid or accrued only in the first
186 taxable year the deduction would have been allowable under
187 26 U.S.C. Section 163, as amended, if the limitation under
188 26 U.S.C. Section 163(j), as amended, did not exist;
189 [(12)] (13) One hundred percent of any retirement
190 benefits received by any taxpayer as a result of the
191 taxpayer's service in the Armed Forces of the United States,
192 including reserve components and the National Guard of this
193 state, as defined in 32 U.S.C. Sections 101(3) and 109, and
194 any other military force organized under the laws of this
195 state;
196 [(13)] (14) For all tax years beginning on or after
197 January 1, 2022, one hundred percent of any federal, state,
198 or local grant moneys received by the taxpayer if the grant
199 money was disbursed for the express purpose of providing or
200 expanding access to broadband internet to areas of the state
201 deemed to be lacking such access;
202 [(14)] (15) (a) For all tax years beginning on or
203 after January 1, 2025, one hundred percent of all income
204 reported as a capital gain for federal income tax purposes
205 by an individual subject to tax pursuant to section 143.011;
206 and
207 (b) For all tax years beginning on or after January
208 first of the tax year following the tax year in which the

SB 1614 8
209 top rate of tax imposed pursuant to section 143.011 is equal
210 to or less than four and one-half percent, one hundred
211 percent of all income reported as a capital gain for federal
212 income tax purposes by an entity subject to tax pursuant to
213 section 143.071; and
214 [(15)] (16) For all tax years beginning on or after
215 January 1, 2026, the portion of capital gain on the sale or
216 exchange of specie, as that term is defined in section
217 408.010, that are otherwise included in the taxpayer's
218 federal adjusted gross income.
219 4. There shall be added to or subtracted from the
220 taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income the taxpayer's
221 share of the Missouri fiduciary adjustment provided in
222 section 143.351.
223 5. There shall be added to or subtracted from the
224 taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income the modifications
225 provided in section 143.411.
226 6. In addition to the modifications to a taxpayer's
227 federal adjusted gross income in this section, to calculate
228 Missouri adjusted gross income there shall be subtracted
229 from the taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income any gain
230 recognized pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Section 1033 of the
231 Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, arising from
232 compulsory or involuntary conversion of property as a result
233 of condemnation or the imminence thereof.
234 7. (1) As used in this subsection, "qualified health
235 insurance premium" means the amount paid during the tax year
236 by such taxpayer for any insurance policy primarily
237 providing health care coverage for the taxpayer, the
238 taxpayer's spouse, or the taxpayer's dependents.
239 (2) In addition to the subtractions in subsection 3 of
240 this section, one hundred percent of the amount of qualified

SB 1614 9
241 health insurance premiums shall be subtracted from the
242 taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income to the extent the
243 amount paid for such premiums is included in federal taxable
244 income. The taxpayer shall provide the department of
245 revenue with proof of the amount of qualified health
246 insurance premiums paid.
247 8. (1) Beginning January 1, 2014, in addition to the
248 subtractions provided in this section, one hundred percent
249 of the cost incurred by a taxpayer for a home energy audit
250 conducted by an entity certified by the department of
251 natural resources under section 640.153 or the
252 implementation of any energy efficiency recommendations made
253 in such an audit shall be subtracted from the taxpayer's
254 federal adjusted gross income to the extent the amount paid
255 for any such activity is included in federal taxable
256 income. The taxpayer shall provide the department of
257 revenue with a summary of any recommendations made in a
258 qualified home energy audit, the name and certification
259 number of the qualified home energy auditor who conducted
260 the audit, and proof of the amount paid for any activities
261 under this subsection for which a deduction is claimed. The
262 taxpayer shall also provide a copy of the summary of any
263 recommendations made in a qualified home energy audit to the
264 department of natural resources.
265 (2) At no time shall a deduction claimed under this
266 subsection by an individual taxpayer or taxpayers filing
267 combined returns exceed one thousand dollars per year for
268 individual taxpayers or cumulatively exceed two thousand
269 dollars per year for taxpayers filing combined returns.
270 (3) Any deduction claimed under this subsection shall
271 be claimed for the tax year in which the qualified home
272 energy audit was conducted or in which the implementation of

SB 1614 10
273 the energy efficiency recommendations occurred. If
274 implementation of the energy efficiency recommendations
275 occurred during more than one year, the deduction may be
276 claimed in more than one year, subject to the limitations
277 provided under subdivision (2) of this subsection.
278 (4) A deduction shall not be claimed for any otherwise
279 eligible activity under this subsection if such activity
280 qualified for and received any rebate or other incentive
281 through a state-sponsored energy program or through an
282 electric corporation, gas corporation, electric cooperative,
283 or municipally owned utility.
284 9. The provisions of subsection 8 of this section
285 shall expire on December 31, 2020.
286 10. (1) As used in this subsection, the following
287 terms mean:
288 (a) "Beginning farmer", a taxpayer who:
289 a. Has filed at least one but not more than ten
290 Internal Revenue Service Schedule F (Form 1040) Profit or
291 Loss From Farming forms since turning eighteen years of age;
292 b. Is approved for a beginning farmer loan through the
293 USDA Farm Service Agency Beginning Farmer direct or
294 guaranteed loan program;
295 c. Has a farming operation that is determined by the
296 department of agriculture to be new production agriculture
297 but is the principal operator of a farm and has substantial
298 farming knowledge; or
299 d. Has been determined by the department of
300 agriculture to be a qualified family member;
301 (b) "Farm owner", an individual who owns farmland and
302 disposes of or relinquishes use of all or some portion of
303 such farmland as follows:
304 a. A sale to a beginning farmer;

SB 1614 11
305 b. A lease or rental agreement not exceeding ten years
306 with a beginning farmer; or
307 c. A crop-share arrangement not exceeding ten years
308 with a beginning farmer;
309 (c) "Qualified family member", an individual who is
310 related to a farm owner within the fourth degree by blood,
311 marriage, or adoption and who is purchasing or leasing or is
312 in a crop-share arrangement for land from all or a portion
313 of such farm owner's farming operation.
314 (2) (a) In addition to all other subtractions
315 authorized in this section, a taxpayer who is a farm owner
316 who sells all or a portion of such farmland to a beginning
317 farmer may subtract from such taxpayer's Missouri adjusted
318 gross income an amount to the extent included in federal
319 adjusted gross income as provided in this subdivision.
320 (b) Subject to the limitations in paragraph (c) of
321 this subdivision, the amount that may be subtracted shall be
322 equal to the portion of capital gains received from the sale
323 of such farmland that such taxpayer receives in the tax year
324 for which such taxpayer subtracts such capital gain.
325 (c) A taxpayer may subtract the following amounts and
326 percentages per tax year in total capital gains received
327 from the sale of such farmland under this subdivision:
328 a. For the first two million dollars received, one
329 hundred percent;
330 b. For the next one million dollars received, eighty
331 percent;
332 c. For the next one million dollars received, sixty
333 percent;
334 d. For the next one million dollars received, forty
335 percent; and

SB 1614 12
336 e. For the next one million dollars received, twenty
337 percent.
338 (d) The department of revenue shall prepare an annual
339 report reviewing the costs and benefits and containing
340 statistical information regarding the subtraction of capital
341 gains authorized under this subdivision for the previous tax
342 year including, but not limited to, the total amount of all
343 capital gains subtracted and the number of taxpayers
344 subtracting such capital gains. Such report shall be
345 submitted before February first of each year to the
346 committee on agriculture policy of the Missouri house of
347 representatives and the committee on agriculture, food
348 production and outdoor resources of the Missouri senate, or
349 the successor committees.
350 (3) (a) In addition to all other subtractions
351 authorized in this section, a taxpayer who is a farm owner
352 who enters a lease or rental agreement for all or a portion
353 of such farmland with a beginning farmer may subtract from
354 such taxpayer's Missouri adjusted gross income an amount to
355 the extent included in federal adjusted gross income as
356 provided in this subdivision.
357 (b) Subject to the limitation in paragraph (c) of this
358 subdivision, the amount that may be subtracted shall be
359 equal to the portion of cash rent income received from the
360 lease or rental of such farmland that such taxpayer receives
361 in the tax year for which such taxpayer subtracts such
362 income.
363 (c) No taxpayer shall subtract more than twenty-five
364 thousand dollars per tax year in total cash rent income
365 received from the lease or rental of such farmland under
366 this subdivision.

SB 1614 13
367 (4) (a) In addition to all other subtractions
368 authorized in this section, a taxpayer who is a farm owner
369 who enters a crop-share arrangement on all or a portion of
370 such farmland with a beginning farmer may subtract from such
371 taxpayer's Missouri adjusted gross income an amount to the
372 extent included in federal adjusted gross income as provided
373 in this subdivision.
374 (b) Subject to the limitation in paragraph (c) of this
375 subdivision, the amount that may be subtracted shall be
376 equal to the portion of income received from the crop-share
377 arrangement on such farmland that such taxpayer receives in
378 the tax year for which such taxpayer subtracts such income.
379 (c) No taxpayer shall subtract more than twenty-five
380 thousand dollars per tax year in total income received from
381 the lease or rental of such farmland under this subdivision.
382 (5) The department of agriculture shall, by rule,
383 establish a process to verify that a taxpayer is a beginning
384 farmer for purposes of this section and shall provide
385 verification to the beginning farmer and farm seller of such
386 farmer's and seller's certification and qualification for
387 the exemption provided in this subsection.
285.400. 1. The provisions of sections 285.400 to
285.440 shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri
Earned Family and Medical Leave Act".
2. As used in sections 285.400 to 285.440, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Average state weekly pay", the total wages earned
by all employees who have contributed to the fund in the
past twelve months, divided by the total number of such
employees, the quotient of which is divided by the average
number of weeks worked by all employees who have contributed
to the fund in the last twelve months;

SB 1614 14
(2) "Average weekly pay", the total wages earned by an
employee in the past twelve months, divided by the number of
weeks worked by the employee in such twelve-month period, or
the weekly salary of the employee at the time that family or
medical leave is taken, whichever is greater provided that
the average weekly pay shall never exceed the average state
weekly pay;
(3) "Care", includes, but is not limited to, physical
care, emotional support, visitation, assistance in
treatment, transportation, arranging for a change in care,
assistance with essential daily living matters, and personal
attendant services;
(4) "Child", a biological, adopted, or foster son or
daughter, a stepson or stepdaughter, a legal ward, a son or
daughter of a domestic or civil union partner, or the person
to whom the employee stands in loco parentis who is under
nineteen years of age or nineteen years of age or older but
incapable of self-care because of mental or physical
impairment;
(5) "Department", the department of labor and
industrial relations;
(6) "Employee", any person performing service for
remuneration unless it is shown to the satisfaction of the
department that such services were performed by an
independent contractor. In determining the existence of the
independent contractor relationship, the common law of
agency right to control shall be applied. The common law of
agency right to control test shall include but not be
limited to: if the alleged employer retains the right to
control the manner and means by which the results are to be
accomplished, the person who performs the service is an

SB 1614 15
employee. If only the results are controlled, the person
performing the service is an independent contractor;
(7) "Employer", any person acting directly or
indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an
employee;
(8) "Family member", a child, parent, grandparent,
grandchild, sibling, spouse, domestic or civil union
partner, or household member, or any ward as that term is
defined in section 475.010;
(9) "Family or medical leave", any of the following:
(a) Leave to bond with a minor child within the first
year of the child's birth or placement in connection with
foster care or adoption;
(b) Leave to care for a family member who has a
serious health condition;
(c) Leave due to an employee's own serious health
condition; or
(d) Leave to assume any familial responsibility
because a spouse, child, or parent of an employee is on, or
has been notified of an impending call to, active duty in
the uniformed services;
(10) "Fund", the Missouri earned family and medical
leave fund established in section 285.435;
(11) "Grandchild", a child of the employee's child;
(12) "Grandparent", a parent of the employee's parent;
(13) "Health care provider", any physician, hospital,
health maintenance organization, ambulatory surgical center,
long-term care facility including those licensed under
chapter 198, dentist, registered or licensed practical
nurse, optometrist, podiatrist, pharmacist, chiropractor,
physical therapist, psychologist, physician-in-training, and
any other person or entity that provides health care

SB 1614 16
services under the authority of a license or certificate of
this state or any other state or foreign country;
(14) "Parent", a biological, foster, or adoptive
parent, a parent-in-law, a stepparent, a legal guardian, or
other person who stood in loco parentis to the employee when
the employee was a child;
(15) "Parent-in-law", the parent of a spouse or
domestic or civil union partner;
(16) "Serious health condition", an illness, injury,
impairment, or physical or mental condition that involves
inpatient care in a hospital, hospice, or residential health
care facility, or continuing medical treatment or continuing
supervision by a health care provider. The term shall
include medical attention, services, or counseling for
victims of stalking, domestic violence, abuse, or sexual
assault, as such terms are defined in section 455.010, or
victims of trafficking for the purpose of sexual
exploitation as described in section 566.209;
(17) "Sibling", a person related to another person by
blood, adoption, or affinity through a common legal or
biological parent;
(18) "Spouse", a partner to a lawful marriage;
(19) "Uniformed services":
(a) Active and reserve components of the Army, Navy,
Air Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard of the United States;
100 (b) The Merchant Marine, the commissioned corps of the
101 Public Health Service, or the commissioned corps of the
102 National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration of the
103 United States; or
104 (c) The Missouri National Guard.
285.405. 1. There is hereby established the "Missouri
Earned Family and Medical Leave Program" to provide up to

SB 1614 17
six weeks of wage replacement benefits to employees who take
time off work for family or medical leave. The department
shall administer and implement the program and the
provisions of sections 285.400 to 285.440, and shall pay
Missouri family or medical leave benefits as specified in
such sections.
2. An employee shall be eligible to receive Missouri
earned family or medical leave program benefits equal to one
hundred percent of his or her average weekly pay for each
full week during which he or she has taken family or medical
leave. An employee may take family or medical leave for a
partial week and shall only be eligible to receive the
fraction of the average weekly pay which is equal to the
number of days of leave taken divided by the number of days
for which such employee would have otherwise worked in the
respective week had the employee not taken family or medical
leave. Any leave taken shall be in full-day increments.
3. No more than six weeks of Missouri earned family
and medical leave benefits shall be paid to an employee
within any fifty-two-week period.
4. An employee shall file a claim for Missouri earned
family and medical leave benefits with the department not
later than the forty-first consecutive day following the
first compensable day with respect to which the claim is
made for benefits, which time shall be extended by the
department upon a showing of good cause. If a first claim
is not complete, the claim form shall be returned to the
employee for completion, and it shall be completed and
returned not later than the tenth consecutive day after the
date it was verifiably sent by the department to the
employee, except that such time shall be extended by the
department upon a showing of good cause.

SB 1614 18
5. No employee shall be eligible for Missouri earned
family and medical leave program benefits with respect to
any day:
(1) That he or she is eligible to receive unemployment
compensation benefits under chapter 288 or under an
unemployment compensation act of any other state or of the
federal government; or
(2) That he or she has received, or is entitled to
receive, any other benefits under chapter 287.
6. No employee shall be eligible for Missouri earned
family and medical leave benefits until such employee has
paid into the Missouri earned family and medical leave fund
for fifty-two weeks.
7. An employee who is entitled to leave under the
Missouri earned family and medical leave act and the Family
and Medical Leave Act (FMLA) under 29 U.S.C. Section 2601,
et seq., shall take family or medical leave under sections
285.400 to 285.440 concurrent with leave taken under the
FMLA.
8. The first payment of Missouri earned family and
medical leave benefits shall be made to an employee within
two weeks after the completed claim is received by the
department or the day the family or medical leave began,
whichever is later. Subsequent payments shall be made
bimonthly.
285.410. 1. (1) An employee shall establish
eligibility for each uninterrupted family or medical care
leave period by filing a first claim for benefits supported
by the certificate of a treating health care provider that
establishes the serious health condition of the family
member that warrants the care of the employee, or that
establishes the serious health condition of the employee.

SB 1614 19
For subsequent periods of uninterrupted leave after the
period covered by the initial certificate or any preceding
continued claim, a claimant shall file a continued claim for
those benefits supported by the certificate of a treating
health care provider.
(2) For employees seeking leave in order to assume a
familial responsibility due to a spouse, child, or parent
being on active duty in the uniformed services, eligibility
for leave shall be established by providing, in a manner
satisfactory to the department, proof of the family member
being on active duty.
(3) For employees seeking leave due to a serious
health condition related to seeking medical attention,
services, or counseling for victims of stalking, domestic
violence, abuse, or sexual assault, as such terms are
defined in section 455.010, or victims of trafficking for
purposes of sexual exploitation as described in section
566.209, the certificate required by subdivision (1) of this
subsection may be provided by any of the following:
(a) A health care provider;
(b) A court which has jurisdiction over a judicial
proceeding relating to the serious health condition of the
employee or the serious health condition of the family
member of the employee; or
(c) A law enforcement officer with knowledge of the
serious health condition of the employee or the serious
health condition of the family member of the employee.
2. The certificates required under subsection 1 of
this section shall be developed by the department. In order
to establish medical eligibility of the serious health
condition of the family member that warrants the care of the
employee, or to establish medical eligibility of the serious

SB 1614 20
health condition of the employee, the information on the
certificate shall be within the physician's or health care
provider's knowledge and shall be based on a physical
examination and documented medical history of the family
member or employee. The certificate shall contain all of
the following:
(1) A diagnosis and diagnostic code prescribed in the
International Classification of Diseases or, if no diagnosis
has yet been obtained, a detailed statement of symptoms;
(2) The date, if known, on which the condition
commenced;
(3) The probable duration of the condition;
(4) An estimate of the amount of time that the
physician or health care provider believes the employee
needs to care for the family member or himself or herself;
and
(5) If applicable, a statement that the serious health
condition warrants the participation of the employee to
provide care for his or her family member.
3. The department shall develop a certificate form
that is separate and distinct from the certificate required
in subsection 1 of this section for an employee taking leave
to bond with a minor child within the first year of the
child's birth or placement in connection with foster care or
adoption.
4. Any claim of an individual who obtains care and
treatment outside the state shall be supported by a
certificate of a treating health care provider duly licensed
or certified by the state or foreign country in which the
claimant is receiving care and treatment.
5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
preclude the department from requesting additional medical

SB 1614 21
evidence to supplement any claim. Any cost incurred for
procuring additional medical evidence shall be paid by the
employee. The department may require that the additional
evidence include any or all of the following:
(1) Identification of diagnoses;
(2) Identification of symptoms;
(3) A statement setting forth the facts of the serious
health condition of the employee or such employee's family
member, which shall be completed by any of the following
individuals:
(a) The health care provider treating the employee or
family member of the employee;
(b) The registrar, authorized medical officer, or
other duly authorized official of the hospital or health
care facility treating the employee or family member of the
employee; or
(c) An examining physician or other representative of
the department;
(4) An affidavit from an employee averring that the
employee or such employee's spouse gave birth to a child or
has adopted or received a child in connection with foster
care.
285.415. Employees shall provide at least thirty days
advance notice to their employer before family and medical
leave is to begin if the need for the leave is foreseeable.
If thirty days notice is not practicable, notice shall be
given to the employer as soon as practicable.
285.420. 1. Except as provided in subsection 4 of
this section, an employee may file a notice of appeal from
any determination of eligibility for benefits made by the
department with the administrative hearing commission
pursuant to chapter 621. Such appeal shall be made by mail

SB 1614 22
or in person within thirty days after the date on which a
copy of the department's decision was received by the
employee.
2. The administrative hearing commission's proposed
decision and order shall be final and not subject to further
appeal, unless within thirty days after the decision is
served on the interested parties, a party files a petition
for judicial review as provided in chapter 536.
3. A determination of the amount of benefits payable
under sections 285.400 to 285.440 shall not serve as a basis
for appeal under this section. However, the determination
shall be subject to request by the employee on family or
medical leave for redetermination by the department at any
time within one year from the date of delivery or mailing of
such determination, or any redetermination thereof. A
redetermination shall be furnished to the individual in
writing.
4. A denial of benefits shall become final in the
absence of timely appeal therefrom. The department may
redetermine a denial of benefits at any time within one year
from delivery or mailing of such denial to correct an error
in identity, omission of fact, or misapplication of law with
respect to the facts.
5. A determination of allowance of benefits shall
become final in the absence of timely appeal therefrom. The
department may redetermine such allowance at any time within
two years following the application year in which such
allowance was made in order to recover any benefits for
which recovery is provided under this section.
6. A redetermination of benefits may be made at any
time for any of the following reasons:

SB 1614 23
(1) To conform to a final court decision applicable to
either an initial determination or a determination of denial
or allowance of benefits;
(2) In the event of a back pay award or settlement
affecting the allowance of benefits; or
(3) In the case of misrepresentation or willful
failure to report a material fact.
Written notice of any such redetermination shall be promptly
given by mail or delivered to such interested parties as
were notified of the initial determination of denial or
allowance of benefits and any new interested party or
parties who, under such rule as the department may adopt,
would be an interested party.
285.425. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, it shall be unlawful for any person to
discharge or in any other manner discriminate against an
employee because the employee has made a claim for,
indicated an intent to make a claim for, or received
Missouri earned family and medical leave benefits.
2. (1) Any person who violates the provisions of
subsection 1 of this section shall be liable to any employee
of such person who is affected by the violation for such
equitable relief as may be appropriate including employment,
reinstatement, or promotion and for damages equal to the sum
of:
(a) The amount of:
a. Any wages, salary, employment benefits, or other
compensation denied or lost to such individual by reason of
the violation; or
b. In a case in which wages, salary, employment
benefits, or other compensation have not been denied or lost

SB 1614 24
to the individual, any actual monetary losses sustained by
the individual as a direct result of the violation, such as
the cost of providing care, up to a sum equal to sixty
calendar days of wages or salary for the individual;
(b) The interest on the amount described in paragraph
(a) of this subdivision, such interest rate being equal to
the market rate as determined by the director of the
division of finance under section 408.030; and
(c) An additional amount as liquidated damages equal
to the sum of the amount described in paragraph (a) of this
subdivision and the interest described in paragraph (b) of
this subdivision, except that if a person who has violated
subsection 1 of this section proves to the satisfaction of
the court that the act or omission was in good faith and
that the person had reasonable grounds for believing that
the act or omission was not a violation, such court may
reduce the amount of such liquidated damages.
(2) The court may additionally require reasonable
attorney's fees, expert witness fees, and other court costs
to be paid by a defendant.
3. An action to recover the relief prescribed in
subsection 2 of this section may be maintained against any
person in any court of competent jurisdiction by the
employee affected.
4. The department may bring an action seeking relief
on behalf of an employee under this section. The right to
bring an action provided under subsection 3 of this section
shall terminate upon the filing of a complaint by the
department. If any damages are recovered in such action,
such damages shall be held in a special deposit account and
paid directly to each employee affected.

SB 1614 25
5. An action may be brought under this section not
later than three years after the date of the alleged
violation for which the action is brought. An action
brought under this section shall be considered to be
commenced on the date when the complaint is filed.
285.430. 1. The department shall develop and
implement an outreach program to ensure that employees who
may be eligible to receive Missouri earned family and
medical leave benefits under sections 285.400 to 285.440 are
made aware of such benefits. Outreach information shall
easily explain eligibility requirements, the claims process,
weekly benefit amounts, maximum benefits payable, notice and
medical certification requirements, reinstatement and
nondiscrimination rights, confidentiality, and the
relationship between employment protection, leave from
employment, wage replacement benefits, and other laws,
collective bargaining agreements, and employer policies.
2. Not later than January 1, 2033, the state auditor
shall submit to the general assembly a report on the
Missouri earned family and medical leave benefits paid for
any month during the one-year period beginning on January 1,
2030. The report shall include the following:
(1) An identification of the total number of
applications for such benefits filed, and the average number
of days between when an application is received and when a
determination is made;
(2) An identification of the total number of requests
for review of an initial adverse determination of
eligibility for such benefits made, and the average number
of days between when such review is requested and when a
final determination of eligibility is made; and

SB 1614 26
(3) An identification of the total number of monthly
benefit claim reports for such benefits filed, and the
average number of days between the date such report is
received and the date on which the initial determination of
eligibility with respect to the claim report is made.
285.435. 1. (1) There is hereby created in the state
treasury the "Missouri Earned Family and Medical Leave
Fund", which shall consist of money collected under this
section. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the
fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the
state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall
be a dedicated fund and money in the fund shall be used
solely by the department of labor and industrial relations
for the purpose of distributing Missouri earned family and
medical leave program benefits.
(2) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
2. (1) In order to provide funding to implement the
provisions of sections 285.400 to 285.440, employees shall
contribute one quarter of one percent of their average
weekly pay to the Missouri earned family and medical leave
fund beginning January 1, 2028.
(2) For purposes of this section, in determining the
average weekly pay of an employee, the total wages of an
employee shall not exceed the contribution and benefit base
established by the Commissioner of Social Security
Administration under 42 U.S.C. Section 430.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 285.405
to the contrary, if there is not sufficient resources in the
fund, the department may, at its discretion, reduce the

SB 1614 27
benefit amount each employee is eligible to receive. If the
benefit amount is reduced, each employee shall receive the
same percent of his or her average weekly wage.
(4) No employee shall receive benefits from the fund
until January 1, 2030.
3. The provisions of sections 23.250 to 23.598 shall
not apply to sections 285.400 to 285.440.
285.440. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term
is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in sections 285.400 to 285.435 shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
November 5, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
Section B. This act is hereby submitted to the
qualified voters of this state for approval or rejection at
an election which is hereby ordered and which shall be held
and conducted on Tuesday next following the first Monday in
November, 2026, pursuant to the laws and constitutional
provisions of this state for the submission of referendum
measures by the general assembly, and this act shall become
effective when approved by a majority of the votes cast
thereon at such election and not otherwise.
✓